Missouri, session 2026, SB1307.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 487, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 487.205, to read as
follows:
487.205. 1. A family court shall not prohibit a
family court participant from possessing or using marijuana
consistent with the provisions of Article XIV of the
Constitution of Missouri and shall not require a family
court participant to refrain from possessing or using
marijuana as a term or condition of successful completion of
the family court program.
2. The possession or use of marijuana consistent with
the provisions of Article XIV of the Constitution of
Missouri shall not, by itself, be used to restrict or
abridge custodial or parental rights to minor children in
any action or proceeding under the jurisdiction of a family
court under this chapter or a juvenile court under chapter
211.
✓